apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_noms.ca.dix
 <pardef n="adjudicat/ari__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>àries</l>
          <r>ari<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ària</l>
          <r>ari<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aris</l>
          <r>ari<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ari</l>
          <r>ari<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="Sr__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="accionist/a__n">      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="rei__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nes</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



  <pardef n="d/éu__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eesses</l>
          <r>éu<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eessa</l>
          <r>éu<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>éus</l>
          <r>éu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>éu</l>
          <r>éu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="/avi__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>àvies</l>
          <r>avi<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>àvia</l>
          <r>avi<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>avis</l>
          <r>avi<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>avi</l>
          <r>avi<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="gitan/o__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="monar/ca__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ques</l>
          <r>ca<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ques</l>
          <r>ca<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ca</l>
          <r>ca<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ca</l>
          <r>ca<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="g/ermen__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>èrmens</l>
          <r>ermen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ermen</l>
          <r>ermen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="n/uvi__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>úvies</l>
          <r>uvi<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>úvia</l>
          <r>uvi<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uvis</l>
          <r>uvi<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uvi</l>
          <r>uvi<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fen/omen__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>òmens</l>
          <r>omen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omen</l>
          <r>omen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="j/ove__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oves</l>
          <r>ove<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oves</l>
          <r>ove<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>óvens</l>
          <r>ove<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>óvens</l>
          <r>ove<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ove</l>
          <r>ove<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ove</l>
          <r>ove<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ascendent__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="mon/jo__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ges</l>
          <r>jo<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ja</l>
          <r>jo<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jos</l>
          <r>jo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jo</l>
          <r>jo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


<pardef n="hero/i__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ïnes</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ïna</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <pardef n="passad/ís__n">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>issos</l>
          <r>ís<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ís</l>
          <r>ís<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<e lm="rei"><i>rei</i><par n="rei__n"/></e>
<e lm="secretari"><i>secret</i><par n="adjudicat/ari__n"/></e>
<e lm="usuari"><i>usu</i><par n="adjudicat/ari__n"/></e>
<e lm="passatger"><i>passatger</i><par n="Sr__n"/></e>
<e lm="pastís"><i>past</i><par n="passad/ís__n"/></e>
<e lm="empresari"><i>empres</i><par n="adjudicat/ari__n"/></e>
<e lm="admirador"><i>admirador</i><par n="Sr__n"/></e>
<e lm="déu"><i>d</i><par n="d/éu__n"/></e>
<e lm="avi"><i></i><par n="/avi__n"/></e>
<e lm="heroi"><i>hero</i><par n="hero/i__n"/></e>
<e lm="adversari"><i>advers</i><par n="adjudicat/ari__n"/></e>
<e lm="contrari"><i>contr</i><par n="adjudicat/ari__n"/></e>
<e lm="interlocutor"><i>interlocutor</i><par n="Sr__n"/></e>
<e lm="especialista"><i>especialist</i><par n="accionist/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="anís"><i>an</i><par n="passad/ís__n"/></e>
<e lm="dignatari"><i>dignat</i><par n="adjudicat/ari__n"/></e>
<e lm="mandatari"><i>mandat</i><par n="adjudicat/ari__n"/></e>
<e lm="fideïcomissari"><i>fideïcomiss</i><par n="adjudicat/ari__n"/></e>
<e lm="monopolitzador"><i>monopolitzador</i><par n="Sr__n"/></e>
<e lm="novel·lista"><i>novel·list</i><par n="accionist/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="pragmatista"><i>pragmatist</i><par n="accionist/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="piragüista"><i>piragüist</i><par n="accionist/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="extorsionador"><i>extorsionador</i><par n="Sr__n"/></e>
<e lm="compatriota"><i>compatriot</i><par n="accionist/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="transitari"><i>transit</i><par n="adjudicat/ari__n"/></e>
<e lm="fuster"><i>fuster</i><par n="Sr__n"/></e>
<e lm="homeòpata"><i>homeòpat</i><par n="accionist/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="plenipotenciari"><i>plenipotenci</i><par n="adjudicat/ari__n"/></e>
<e lm="proxeneta"><i>proxenet</i><par n="accionist/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="nedador"><i>nedador</i><par n="Sr__n"/></e>
<e lm="instigador"><i>instigador</i><par n="Sr__n"/></e>
<e lm="polemista"><i>polemist</i><par n="accionist/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="paleògraf"><i>paleògraf</i><par n="Sr__n"/></e>
<e lm="contorsionista"><i>contorsionist</i><par n="accionist/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="compositor"><i>compositor</i><par n="Sr__n"/></e>
<e lm="actuari"><i>actu</i><par n="adjudicat/ari__n"/></e>
<e lm="encaminador"><i>encaminador</i><par n="Sr__n"/></e>
<e lm="borratxo"><i>borratx</i><par n="gitan/o__n"/></e>
<e lm="sonetista"><i>sonetist</i><par n="accionist/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="patriarca"><i>patriar</i><par n="monar/ca__n"/></e>
<e lm="bibliotecari"><i>bibliotec</i><par n="adjudicat/ari__n"/></e>
<e lm="germen"><i>g</i><par n="g/ermen__n"/></e>
<e lm="oligarca"><i>oligar</i><par n="monar/ca__n"/></e>
<e lm="nuvi"><i>n</i><par n="n/uvi__n"/></e>
<e lm="detector"><i>detector</i><par n="Sr__n"/></e>
<e lm="xantatgista"><i>xantatgist</i><par n="accionist/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="brunyidor"><i>brunyidor</i><par n="Sr__n"/></e>
<e lm="duetista"><i>duetist</i><par n="accionist/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="serradís"><i>serrad</i><par n="passad/ís__n"/></e>
<e lm="veterinari"><i>veterin</i><par n="adjudicat/ari__n"/></e>
<e lm="tradicionalista"><i>tradicionalist</i><par n="accionist/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="fenomen"><i>fen</i><par n="fen/omen__n"/></e>
<e lm="bibliògraf"><i>bibliògraf</i><par n="Sr__n"/></e>
<e lm="jove"><i>j</i><par n="j/ove__n"/></e>
<e lm="sentinella"><i>sentinell</i><par n="accionist/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="ascendent"><i>ascendent</i><par n="ascendent__n"/></e>
<e lm="usufructuari"><i>usufructu</i><par n="adjudicat/ari__n"/></e>
<e lm="milionari"><i>milion</i><par n="adjudicat/ari__n"/></e>
<e lm="monjo"><i>mon</i><par n="mon/jo__n"/></e>
<e lm="telefonista"><i>telefonist</i><par n="accionist/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="ramader"><i>ramader</i><par n="Sr__n"/></e>
<e lm="revolucionari"><i>revolucion</i><par n="adjudicat/ari__n"/></e>
<e lm="pallasso"><i>pallass</i><par n="gitan/o__n"/></e>
<e lm="panadís"><i>panad</i><par n="passad/ís__n"/></e>
<e lm="tapís"><i>tap</i><par n="passad/ís__n"/></e>
<e lm="voluntari"><i>volunt</i><par n="adjudicat/ari__n"/></e>
<e lm="comparatista"><i>comparatist</i><par n="accionist/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="monarca"><i>monar</i><par n="monar/ca__n"/></e>
<e lm="perdedor"><i>perdedor</i><par n="Sr__n"/></e>
